California statutes. Labor Code
(b) An employee applying for SIBTF benefits shall provide the director with documentation and other information about any monetary payments they receive for or on account of a preexisting disability or impairment requested by the director. No issue relating to a dispute over any monetary payments received by the employee for or on account of a preexisting disability or impairment may be the subject of a declaration of readiness to proceed unless the director has first been provided with the documentation or other information requested by the director.

(c) This section shall be given broad interpretation to prevent double recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 9.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.5.

In any hearing, investigation, or proceeding, the state shall be represented by the Attorney General, or the attorneys of the Department of Industrial Relations, as appointed by the director. Expenses incident to representation, including costs for investigation, medical examinations, other expert reports, fees for witnesses, and other necessary and proper expenses, but excluding the salary of any of the Attorney General’s deputies, shall be reimbursed from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund. No witness fees or fees for medical or medical-legal services shall exceed those fees
 for the same services prescribed by the appeals board or the administrative director by rule or regulation. Reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and in augmentation of, any other appropriations made or funds available for the use or support of the legal representation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 10.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.

(a) The appeals board shall fix and award the amounts of SIBTF benefits to be paid under this article, and shall direct the
 director, as trustee or administrator of SIBTF, to pay the additional compensation awarded.

(b) For the purposes of determining eligibility for SIBTF benefits and the amount of an award of SIBTF benefits, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The preexisting disability or impairment’s existence and effect on the employee’s ability to engage in work shall be found by a medical evaluator in a medical-legal report that constitutes substantial evidence and documented in medical evidence in existence prior to the subsequent industrial injury. The evidentiary presumption established in subdivision (b) of Section 4664 does not apply.

(2) The degree of prior permanent partial disability shall be rated
 as the disability is determined to have existed on the date of the subsequent compensable injury.

(3) For purposes of determining whether the degree of permanent disability caused by the subsequent compensable injury meets the threshold requirements for an award of SIBTF benefits as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 4751, whole person impairment percentage ratings for multiple body parts shall not be added, but shall be combined with the subsequent compensable injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 11.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.1.

(a) This section shall apply to all compensable subsequent injuries for which there has not been a final determination of SIBTF liability as of the date this section is operative.

(b) For purposes of determining eligibility for, and the amount of an award of, SIBTF benefits to be paid under this article, the existence of preexisting permanent partial disability that existed at the time of the subsequent compensable injury shall be determined by substantial evidence based on medical records, testimony, and other evidence in existence at the time of the subsequent industrial injury. A preexisting disability or impairment shall not be established by a retroactive prophylactic work restriction.

(c) Medical-legal evidence in a claim for SIBTF benefits pursuant to this article shall be obtained in the manner set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4060) of Chapter 7 of Part 1. A claim for SIBTF benefits pursuant to this article shall be supported only by medical-legal evidence obtained in the course of the claim for the subsequent industrial injury, unless no evidence exists or the evaluator who opined in the claim for the subsequent industrial injury is no longer serving as an evaluator.

(d) Any new medical-legal evidence in a claim for SIBTF benefits pursuant to this article shall not be used to establish liability for a subsequent industrial injury or the level of the subsequent injury disability. The underlying claim for regular benefits shall not be relitigated in the claim for SIBTF benefits.

(e) Vocational rehabilitation reports, or other
 vocational evidence, obtained solely for a proceeding pursuant to this article that were not obtained for use as evidence in the proceeding for compensation for the subsequent compensable injury are not admissible, and the costs of those reports shall not be reimbursable in proceedings under this article.

(f) The director may issue regulations as necessary for the implementation and orderly and effective administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 12.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.2.

An application for SIBTF benefits under this article shall be made five years from the date of the subsequent industrial injury described in subdivision (a) of Section 4751 or six months from a resolution of the issue of permanent disability in the subsequent injury claim whether by compromise and release, stipulations with request for award, or findings and award, whichever date is later. Section 3202 shall not be applied to extend the time for filing an application for SIBTF benefits beyond the limitations period established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 13.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.3.

(a) SIBTF shall not be liable for the payment of interest on any awards or order for payment of attorney’s fees.

(b) SIBTF shall not be liable for any penalties.

(c) The director, as administrator and trustee, shall pay the claimant only those benefits as allowed under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 14.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.5.

Nothing in this article shall impair the right of the Attorney General or the Department of Industrial Relations to release by compromise any claims brought under the provisions of this article. No such compromise and release agreement is valid unless it is approved by the appeals board; however, the provisions of Sections 5000 to 5004, inclusive, of this code, shall not apply to such compromise and release agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 894, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

4755.

(a) The director may draw from the State Treasury out of the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund for the purposes specified in Section 4751, without at the time presenting vouchers and itemized statements, a sum not to exceed in the aggregate fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), to be used as a cash revolving fund. The revolving fund shall be deposited in any banks and under any conditions as the Department of Finance determines. The Controller shall draw
 their
 warrants in favor of the director for the amounts so withdrawn and the Treasurer shall pay these warrants.

(b) Expenditures made from the revolving fund in payments on claims for any additional compensation and for adjusting services are exempted from the operation of Section 16003 of the Government Code. Reimbursement of the revolving fund for these expenditures shall be made upon presentation to the Controller of an abstract or statement of the expenditures. The abstract or statement shall be in any form as the Controller requires.

(c) The director shall assign claims adjustment services and legal representation services respecting matters
 concerning subsequent injuries. The director or
 their representative may make these service assignments within the department, or they may contract for these services with the State Compensation Insurance Fund or outside vendors, for a fee in addition to that authorized by Section 4754, except insofar as these matters might conflict with the interests of the State Compensation Insurance Fund. The administrative costs associated with these services shall be reimbursed from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, except when a budget impasse requires advances as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 62.5.
 To the extent permitted by state law, the director may contract for audits or reports of services under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 15.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4756.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interest of the State of California to provide a person, regardless of their citizenship or immigration status, with the benefits provided pursuant to this article, and therefore enacts this section pursuant to Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) A person shall not be prohibited from receiving compensation paid or payable from the Subsequent Injuries Benefits Trust Fund solely because of
 their citizenship or immigration status.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to override Section 15740 of Article 1 of Subchapter 2.1.1 of Chapter 8 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) The provisions of this section are declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 16.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4757.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the changes made by the act that added this section are procedural and shall apply to all claims for SIBTF benefits, as defined in Section 4750 of the Labor Code, for which there is not a final determination as of the date this section is operative.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to Section 4754.2 of the Labor Code as added by the act that added this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 17.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4758.

(a) This section applies to a claim for SIBTF benefits that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Prior to June 1, 2026, the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board district office set a date for the trial regarding the claim for SIBTF benefits.

(2) Prior to June 1, 2026, a pretrial conference statement regarding the claim for SIBTF benefits was signed by counsel for the applicant or the applicant if unrepresented and by counsel for the director and filed with the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board district office.

(3) (A) On or prior to June 1, 2026, a declaration of readiness to proceed
 requesting a mandatory settlement conference was filed with the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board district office indicating that the SIBTF claim was ready to proceed to trial.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), this section does not apply to a declaration of readiness to proceed requesting a mandatory settlement conference filed with the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board district office on or prior to June 1, 2026, indicating that the SIBTF claim was ready to proceed to trial that was continued or taken off calendar because the claim was not ready to proceed to trial.

(C) A claim described in subparagraph (A) where the mandatory settlement conference is continued or taken off calendar because the parties have reached a settlement is subject to this section.

(4) The application for SIBTF benefits was filed
 with the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board district office on or before July 1, 2020.

(b) For claims described in subdivision (a), all of the following provisions shall apply in lieu of Sections 4751, 4753, 4753.5, and 4754, as those sections were amended by the act that added this section:

(1) If an employee who is permanently partially disabled receives a subsequent compensable injury resulting in additional permanent partial disability so that the degree of disability caused by the combination of both disabilities is greater than that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone, and the combined effect of the last injury and the previous disability or impairment is a permanent disability equal to 70 percent or more of total, they shall be paid in addition to the compensation due under this code for the permanent partial disability caused by the last injury
 compensation for the remainder of the combined permanent disability existing after the last injury as provided in this article; provided, that either (a) the previous disability or impairment affected a hand, an arm, a foot, a leg, or an eye, and the permanent disability resulting from the subsequent injury affects the opposite and corresponding member, and such latter permanent disability, when considered alone and without regard to, or adjustment for, the occupation or age of the employee, is equal to 5 percent or more of total, or (b) the permanent disability resulting from the subsequent injury, when considered alone and without regard to or adjustment for the occupation or the age of the employee, is equal to 35 percent or more of total. 

(2) Such additional compensation is not in addition to but shall be reduced to the extent of any monetary payments received by the employee, from
 any source whatsoever, for or on account of such preexisting disability or impairment, except as to payments being made to the employee or to which they are entitled as a pension or other compensation for disability incurred in service in the Armed Forces of the United States, and except as to payments being made to the employee or to which the employee is entitled as assistance under the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000), or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 3, or Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000), of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and excluding from such monetary payments received by the employee for or on account of such preexisting disability or impairment a sum equal to all sums reasonably and necessarily expended by the employee for or on account of attorney’s fees, costs, and expenses incidental to the recovery of
 such monetary payments.

(3) In any hearing, investigation, or proceeding, the state shall be represented by the Attorney General, or the attorneys of the Department of Industrial Relations, as appointed by the director. Expenses incident to representation, including costs for investigation, medical examinations, other expert reports, fees for witnesses, and other necessary and proper expenses, but excluding the salary of any of the Attorney General’s deputies, shall be reimbursed from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund. No witness fees or fees for medical services shall exceed those fees prescribed by the appeals board for the same services in those cases where the appeals board, by rule, has prescribed fees. Reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and in augmentation of, any other appropriations made or funds available for the use or support of the legal representation. 

(4) The appeals board shall fix and award the amounts of special additional compensation to be paid under this article, and shall direct the director, as trustee or administrator of SIBTF, to pay the additional compensation so awarded. Such additional compensation may be paid only from funds appropriated for such purpose. Out of any such appropriation the fund may reimburse itself for the cost of service rendered in payment of compensation awards pursuant to this article and maintenance of accounts and records pertaining thereto, which cost shall not exceed 5 percent of the amount of award paid. 

(c) Sections 4750, 4754.1, 4754.2, 4754.3, and 4757, as amended by the act that added this section, shall not apply to claims described in subdivision (a).

(d) This
 section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and, as of January 1, 2032, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 18.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Special Payments to Certain Persons [4800. - 4820.]

4800.

(a) Whenever any member of the Department of Justice falling within the “state peace officer/firefighter” class is disabled by injury arising out of and in the course of his or her duties, he or she shall become entitled, regardless of his or her period of service with the Department of Justice to leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary, in lieu of disability payments under this chapter, for a period not exceeding one year. This section applies only to members of the Department of Justice whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement and does not apply to persons employed in the Department of Justice whose principal duties are those of telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise clearly not falling within the scope of active law enforcement service, even though this
 person is subject to occasional call or is occasionally called upon to perform duties within the scope of active law enforcement service.

(b) This section applies to law enforcement officers employed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife who are described in subdivision (e) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section applies to harbor police officers employed by the San Francisco Port Commission who are described in Section 20402 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall does not apply to periods of disability that occur subsequent to termination of employment by resignation, retirement, or dismissal. When this section does not apply, the employee shall be eligible for those benefits that would apply if this section had not been enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 175.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4800.5.

(a) Whenever any sworn member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol is disabled by a single injury, excluding disabilities that are the result of cumulative trauma or cumulative injuries, arising out of and in the course of his or her duties, he or she shall become entitled, regardless of his or her period of service with the patrol, to leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary, in lieu of disability payments under this chapter, for a period of not exceeding one year. This section shall apply only to members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement and shall not apply to persons employed in the Department of the California Highway Patrol whose principal duties are those of telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise clearly not falling within the scope of active law enforcement service, even though this person is subject to occasional call or is occasionally called upon to perform the duties of active law enforcement service.

(b) Benefits payable for eligible sworn members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol whose disability is solely the result of cumulative trauma or injury shall be limited to the actual period of temporary disability or entitlement to maintenance allowance, or for one year, whichever is less.

(c) This section shall not apply to periods of disability that occur subsequent to termination of employment by resignation, retirement, or dismissal. When this section does not apply, the employee shall be eligible for those benefits that would apply had this section not been enacted.

(d) The appeals board may determine, upon request of any party, whether or not the disability referred to in this section arose out of and in the course of duty. In any action in which a dispute exists regarding the nature of the injury or the period of temporary disability or entitlement to maintenance allowance, or both, and upon the request of any party thereto, the appeals board shall determine when the disability commenced and ceased, and the amount of benefits provided by this division to which the employee is entitled during the period of this disability. The appeals board shall have the jurisdiction to award and enforce payment of these benefits, subject to subdivision (a) or (b), pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 5300). A decision issued by the appeals board under this section is final and binding upon the parties subject to the rights of appeal contained in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5900) of Part 4.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (g), this section shall apply for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1995.

(f) This section does not apply to peace officers designated under subdivision (a) of Section 2250.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(g) Peace officers of the California State Police Division who become sworn members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol as a result of the Governor’s Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1995, other than those officers described in subdivision (f), shall be eligible for injury benefits accruing to sworn members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol under this division only for injuries occurring on or after July 12, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.

It shall be the duty of the appeals board to determine in the case of members of the California Highway Patrol, upon request of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or Department of Justice, and, in the case of the harbor policemen, upon the request of the San Francisco Port Commission, whether or not the disability referred to in Section 4800 arose out of and in the course of duty. The appeals board shall, also, in any disputed case, determine when such disability ceases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1089.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

Any such member of the California Highway Patrol or Department of Justice, or any such harbor policeman, so disabled is entitled from the date of injury and regardless of retirement under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, to the medical, surgical and hospital benefits prescribed by this division as part of the compensation for persons injured in the course of and arising out of their employment, at the expense of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, or the San Francisco Port Commission, as the case may be, and such expense shall be charged upon the fund out of which the compensation of the member is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

4803.

Whenever such disability of such member of the California Highway Patrol, or Department of Justice, or of such harbor policeman, continues for a period beyond one year, such member or harbor policeman shall thereafter be subject, as to disability indemnity, to the provisions of this division other than Section 4800, which refers to temporary disability only, during the remainder of the disability, except that such compensation shall be paid out of funds available for the support of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, or the San Francisco Port Commission, as the case may be, and the leave of absence shall continue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

No disability indemnity shall be paid to said member of the California Highway Patrol or harbor policeman as temporary disability concurrently with wages or salary payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1553.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.1.

Whenever any member of a University of California fire department specified in Section 3212.4 falling within the active “firefighting and prevention service” class is disabled by injury arising out of and in the course of his duties, he shall become entitled, regardless of his period of service with a University of California fire department, to leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary, in lieu of disability payments under this chapter, for a period of not exceeding one year. This section shall apply only to members of a University of California fire department whose principal duties consist of active firefighting and prevention service and shall not apply to persons employed in a University of California fire department whose principal duties are those of telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise clearly not falling within the scope of active firefighting and prevention service, even though such person is subject to occasional call or is occasionally called upon to perform duties within the scope of active firefighting and prevention service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1149.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.2.

It shall be the duty of the appeals board to determine in the case of members of a University of California fire department specified in Section 4804. 1, upon request of the Regents of the University of California, whether or not the disability referred to in Section 4804.1 arose out of and in the course of duty. The appeals board shall, also in any disputed case, determine when such disability ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1149.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.3.

Any such member of a University of California fire department specified in Section 4804.1, so disabled is entitled from the date of injury and regardless of retirement under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or other retirement system, to the medical, surgical, and hospital benefits prescribed by this division as part of the compensation for persons injured in the course of and arising out of their employment, at the expense of the Regents of the University of California, and such expense shall be charged upon the fund out of which the compensation of the member is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1149.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.4.

Whenever such disability of such member of a University of California fire department, specified in Section 4804.1, continues for a period beyond one year, such member shall thereafter be subject, as to disability indemnity, to the provisions of this division other than Section 4804.1, which refers to temporary disability only, during the remainder of the disability, except that such compensation shall be paid out of funds available for the support of the Regents of the University of California, and the leave of absence shall continue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1149.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.5.

No disability indemnity shall be paid to said member of a University of California fire department, specified in Section 4804.1, as temporary disability concurrently with wages or salary payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1149.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.

Whenever any member of the University of California Police Department falling within the “law enforcement” class is disabled by injury arising out of and in the course of his duties, he shall become entitled, regardless of his period of service with the police department, to leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary, in lieu of disability payments under this chapter, for a period of not exceeding one year. This section shall apply only to members of the University of California Police Department whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement, and shall not apply to persons employed in the University of California Police Department whose principal duties are those of telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic or otherwise clearly not falling within the scope of active law enforcement service, even though such person is subject to occasional call or is occasionally called upon to perform duties within the scope of active law enforcement service.

This section shall apply only to those members of the University of California Police Department specified in Section 3213.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

4807.

It shall be the duty of the appeals board to determine, in the case of members of the University of California Police Department, upon the request of the Regents of the University of California, whether or not the disability referred to in Section 4806 arose out of and in the course of duty. The appeals board shall, also in any disputed case, determine when such disability ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

4808.

Any such member of the University of California Police Department so disabled is entitled from the date of injury, and regardless of retirement under either the University of California Retirement System or Public Employees’ Retirement System, to the medical, surgical, and hospital benefits prescribed by this division as part of the compensation for persons injured in the course of and arising out of their employment, at the expense of the Regents of the University of California, and such expense shall be charged upon the fund out of which the compensation of the member is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.

Whenever such disability of such member of the University of California Police Department continues for a period beyond one year, such member shall thereafter be subject, as to disability indemnity, to the provisions of this division other than Section 4806, which refers to temporary disability only, during the remainder of the disability, except that such compensation shall be paid out of funds available for the support of the Regents of the University of California and the leave of absence shall continue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

4810.

No disability indemnity shall be paid to such member of the University of California Police Department as temporary disability concurrently with wages or salary payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

4811.

(a) Whenever any member of State Bargaining Unit 8 employed by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection is disabled by injury arising out of and in the course of their duties, they shall become entitled, regardless of their period of service with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, to leave of absence while disabled without loss of salary, in lieu of disability payments under this chapter, for a period not exceeding one year.

(b) If the disabling injury described in subdivision (a) is a severe burn as determined by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection or their designee, the employee shall become entitled, regardless of their period of service, to leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary, in lieu of
 disability payments under this chapter, for a period not exceeding three years.

(c) An employee shall only receive benefits pursuant to this section during the time period for which they would normally be employed. When this section does not apply, the employee shall be eligible for those benefits that would apply if this section had not been enacted.

(d) This section shall not apply to periods of disability that occur subsequent to termination of employment by resignation, retirement, or dismissal. When this section does not apply, the employee shall be eligible for those benefits that would apply if this section had not been enacted.

(e) This section shall also apply to an employee related to State Bargaining Unit 8 and employed by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection who is excepted from the definition
 of “state employee” in subdivision (c) of Section 3513 of the Government Code.

(f) This section shall apply to injuries sustained on or after November 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 250, Sec. 14.   (AB 151)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4816.

Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement applicable to members of the California State University Police Department, whenever any member of that police department falling within the “law enforcement” class is disabled by injury or illness arising out of and in the course of his or her duties, he or she shall become entitled, regardless of his or her period of service with the police department, to enhanced industrial disability leave equivalent to the injured employee’s net take home salary on the date of occurrence of the injury. For the purposes of this section, “net take home salary” means the amount of salary received after federal income tax, state income tax, and the employee’s retirement contribution has been deducted from the employee’s gross salary, in lieu of disability payments under this chapter, for a period of not exceeding one year. No benefits shall be paid under this section for any psychiatric disability or any physical disability arising from a psychiatric injury.

This section shall apply only to members of the California State University Police Department whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement, and shall not apply to persons employed in the California State University Police Department whose principal duties are those of telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise clearly not falling within the scope of active law enforcement service, even though the person is subject to occasional call or is occasionally called upon to perform duties within the scope of active law enforcement service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 50, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4817.

It shall be the duty of the appeals board to determine, in the case of members of the California State University Police Department, upon the request of the Board of Trustees of the California State University, whether or not the disability referred to in Section 4816 arose out of and in the course of duty. The appeals board shall, also in any disputed case, determine when such disability ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4819.

Whenever the disability of a member of the California State University Police Department continues for a period beyond one year, that member shall thereafter be subject, as to disability indemnity, to the provisions of this division other than Section 4816, which refers to temporary disability only, during the remainder of the disability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4820.

No disability indemnity shall be paid to a member of the California State University Police Department as temporary disability concurrently with wages or salary payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 50, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. City Police and Firemen, Sheriffs, and Others [4850. - 4856.]

4850.

(a) Whenever any person listed in subdivision (b), who is employed on a regular, full-time basis, and is disabled, whether temporarily or permanently, by injury or illness arising out of and in the course of the person’s duties, the person shall become entitled, regardless of the person’s period of service with the city, county, or district, to a leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary in lieu of temporary disability payments or maintenance allowance payments, if any, that would be payable under this chapter, for the period of the disability, but not exceeding one year, or until that earlier date as the person is retired on permanent disability pension, and is actually receiving disability pension payments, or advanced disability
 pension payments pursuant to Section 4850.3.

(b) The persons eligible under subdivision (a) include all of the following:

(1) City police officers.

(2) City, county, or district firefighters.

(3) Sheriffs.

(4) Officers or employees of any sheriff’s offices.

(5) Inspectors, investigators, detectives, or personnel with comparable titles in any district attorney’s office.

(6) County probation officers, group counselors, or juvenile services officers.

(7) Officers or employees of a probation office.

(8) Peace officers under Section 830.31 of the Penal Code employed on a regular, full-time basis by a county of the first class.

(9) Lifeguards employed year round on a regular, full-time basis by a county of the first class or by the City of San Diego.

(10) Airport law enforcement officers under subdivision (d) of Section 830.33 of the Penal Code.

(11) Harbor or port police officers, wardens, or special officers of a harbor or port district or city or county harbor department under subdivision (a) of Section 830.1 or subdivision (b) of Section 830.33 of the
 Penal Code.

(12) Police officers of the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(13) Peace officers, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.31 of the Penal Code, who are employed on a regular, full-time basis by a county of the eighth class as defined by Sections 28020 and 28029 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall apply only to persons listed in subdivision (b) who meet the requirements of subdivision
 (a), and shall not include any of the following:

(1) Employees of a police department whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service.

(2) Employees of a county sheriff’s office whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly come within the scope of active law enforcement service.

(3) Employees of a county probation office whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly
 come within the scope of active law enforcement service.

(4) Employees of a city fire department, county fire department, or fire district whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly fall within the scope of active firefighting and prevention service.

(d) If the employer is insured, the payments that, except for this section, the insurer would be obligated to make as disability indemnity to the injured, the insurer may pay to the insured.

(e) No leave of absence taken pursuant to this section by a peace officer, as defined by Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or by a city, county,